California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) (1) Sixty percent of the total funds available for grants shall be allocated to cities and districts, other than regional park, open-space, or park and open-space districts. Each city’s and each such district’s allocation shall be in the same ratio as the city’s or district’s population is to the combined total of the state’s population that is included in incorporated areas and in unincorporated areas within districts, except that each city or district shall be entitled to a minimum allocation of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). In any instance in which the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of a district, the population in the area of overlapping jurisdictions shall be attributed to each jurisdiction in proportion to the extent to which each operates and manages parks and recreational areas and facilities for that population. In any instance in which the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of a district, and in the area of overlap the city does not operate and manage parks and recreational areas and facilities, all grant funds shall be allocated to the district.

(2) Each city and other district whose boundaries overlap, shall develop a specific plan for allocating the grant funds in accordance with the formula specified in paragraph (1). If, by October 1, 1986, the plan has not been agreed to by the affected jurisdictions and submitted to the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Director of Parks and Recreation shall determine the allocation of the grant funds among the affected jurisdictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5721.

(a) Individual applications for grants shall be submitted to the department for approval as to conformity with the requirements of this chapter. The application shall be accompanied by certification from the planning agency of the applicant that the project for which the grant is applied is consistent with the park and recreation element of the applicable city or county’s general plan or the district’s park and recreation plan and will satisfy a high priority need. In order to utilize available grant funds as effectively as possible, overlapping or adjoining jurisdictions are encouraged to combine projects and submit a joint application.

(b) The minimum amount that the applicant may request for any individual project is twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(c) Every application shall comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(d) Grants that are wholly or partially for the acquisition of real property shall be made on the basis of 75 percent state funds and 25 percent local matching funds or property donated to be part of the project. The grant recipient shall certify to the department that there is available, or will become available prior to the commencement of any work on the project, matching funds or property in the required amount from a nonstate source. Certification of the source and amount or value shall be set forth in the application.

(e) The director shall annually forward a statement of the total amount to be appropriated in each fiscal year for projects approved for grants to the Director of Finance for inclusion in the Budget Bill. The amount of grant funds to be allocated to each eligible jurisdiction shall be published in the Governor’s Budget for the fiscal year in which the appropriation for those grants is to be made and, as soon as possible thereafter, a list of projects for which grants have been approved shall be made available by the department.

(f) Grant funds shall be encumbered by the recipient within three years of the date the appropriation became effective, regardless of the date when the project was approved by the department pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5722.

Grant funds may be expended for development, rehabilitation, or restoration only on lands owned by, or subject to a lease or other long-term interest held by, the applicant. If the lands are not owned by the applicant, the applicant shall first demonstrate to the satisfaction of the director that the development, rehabilitation, or restoration will provide benefits commensurate with the type and duration of interest in land held by the applicant. No grant funds may be expended for any purpose that is not directly related to the operation and management of parks and recreational areas and facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5723.

(a) No grant funds authorized by this chapter shall be disbursed until the applicant agrees that any property acquired or developed with those funds shall be used by the applicant only for the purpose for which the funds were requested and that no other use of the property shall be permitted except by specific act of the Legislature.

(b) No funds shall be disbursed unless the applicant agrees to maintain and operate the property to be acquired or developed for a period commensurate with the type of project and the proportion of state funds and local matching funds or property allocated to the capital costs of the project.

(c) No funds shall be disbursed unless the applicant agrees to make the property to be acquired or developed open to use by the public by a date specified in the agreement. That date shall not be more than three years after the date upon which the project was approved by the department pursuant to Section 5721. The department may grant a postponement of the specified date if the property is not or will not be open to use by the public by the specified date due to circumstances wholly beyond the control of the applicant. If the property is not open to use by the public by the date specified in the agreement, and any postponement thereof granted by the department, the grant funds shall be restored in full to the department and the applicant shall become ineligible to receive any further funds that may become available pursuant to this chapter. Any funds restored pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the fund and shall be available for appropriation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5711.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5724.

Any grant made pursuant to this chapter, and the performance of the applicant in expending the grant, may be audited at any time by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5725.

Of the total funds available for appropriation pursuant to this chapter, an amount, not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), may be appropriated for state administrative costs directly incurred in connection with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Fiscal Provisions [5730. - 5738.]

5730.

Bonds in the total amount of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5731.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds maturing each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5732.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for the purpose of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum which is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 5733, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5733.

For the purposes of carrying out this article, the Director of Finance may, pursuant to appropriate authority in each annual Budget Act, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any moneys made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund from moneys received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The money withdrawn from the General Fund shall be returned to the General Fund with interest at the rate earned by the money in the Pooled Money Investment Account during the time the money was withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5733.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

5734.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5735.

Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Community Parklands Program Finance Committee is hereby created. The committee consists of the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Treasurer. For purposes of this chapter, the Community Parklands Program Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, and the Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5736.

All money deposited in the fund which is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5737.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5738.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 43 at the June 3, 1986, election.   Operative July 1, 1986, by Stats. 1986, Ch. 5, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.8. California River Parkways Act of 2004 [5750. - 5756.]

5750.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California River Parkways Act of 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 14.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5751.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) River parkways directly improve the quality of life in California by providing important recreational, open space, wildlife, flood management, water quality, and urban waterfront revitalization benefits to communities in the state.

(b) River parkways provide communities with safe places for recreation including family picnics; bicycling and hiking; areas for river access for swimming, canoeing, and fishing; and many other activities.

(c) River parkways help revitalize deteriorated urban neighborhoods and provide an anchor for economic development by providing important recreational and scenic amenities.

(d) River parkways provide accessible open space that helps remedy the severe shortage of park and open-space areas that plague many urban and suburban communities, small towns, and rural areas.

(e) River parkways provide flood protection benefits for communities by providing wider corridors along our waterways that help store, and provide safe corridors for the passage of, storm waters.

(f) River parkways protect and restore riparian and riverine habitat.

(g) River parkways improve or protect the water quality in our rivers and streams.

(h) River parkways provide the recreational and ecosystem components of integrated regional water management and watershed plans.

(i) California can improve the quality of life in this state by assisting public agencies and nonprofit organizations in establishing, developing, and restoring river parkways.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 14.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5752.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Acquisition” means obtaining fee title or a lesser interest in real property, including easements, development rights, or water rights.

(b) “Development” includes, but is not limited to, improvement, rehabilitation, restoration, enhancement, preservation, protection, and interpretation.

(c) “Interpretation” includes, but is not limited to, visitor-serving amenities that communicate the significance and value of natural, historical, and cultural resources in a way that increases understanding and enjoyment of those resources.

(d) “Nonprofit organization” means a private, nonprofit organization that qualifies for exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

(e) “Parkways program” means the California River Parkways Program established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5753.

(f) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 14.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5753.

(a) The California River Parkways Program is hereby established in the office of the Secretary of the Resources Agency, to be administered by the secretary.

(b) The secretary shall make grants available to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for river parkway projects from moneys appropriated to the secretary. Those funds may also be used for costs directly related to the delivery of the river parkways program.

(c) Grants may be awarded for the acquisition of land for river parkways or for the restoration, protection, and development of river parkways in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Not more than 10 percent of the funds appropriated to the secretary for river parkways may be used for urban stream restoration projects pursuant to Section 7048 of the Water Code.

(d) All projects shall comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(e) All acquisitions shall be from willing sellers.

(f) To be eligible for a grant, a project shall provide public access or be a component of a larger parkway plan that provides public access and, at a minimum, meets two of any of the following conditions:

(1) Provide compatible recreational opportunities including trails for strolling, hiking, bicycling, and equestrian uses along rivers and streams.

(2) Protect, improve, or restore riverine or riparian habitat, including benefits to wildlife habitat and water quality.

(3) Maintain or restore the open-space character of lands along rivers and streams so that they are compatible with periodic flooding as part of a flood management plan or project.

(4) Convert existing developed riverfront land uses into uses consistent with river parkways, as identified in this chapter.

(5) Provide facilities to support or interpret river or stream restoration or other conservation activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 14.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5754.

To the extent funds are available, the secretary shall develop guidelines for the preparation and consideration of river parkway plans for the purpose of Section 5753 and may award grants to assist in development of such plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 14.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5755.

The secretary shall report annually to the Legislature regarding the geographic distribution, types, and benefits of projects funded pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 14.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5756.

The secretary shall develop regulations, criteria, or procedural guidelines for the implementation of this chapter that shall be consistent with, but not limited to, Section 5753. All regulations, criteria, and procedural guides adopted by the secretary to implement this chapter are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 14.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Recreation and Park Districts [5780. - 5796.20.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5780. - 5780.9.]

5780.

(a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Recreation and Park District Law.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that recreation, park, and open-space facilities and services are important to improving and protecting the quality of life for all Californians. The Legislature further finds and declares that the provision of recreation, park, and open-space facilities and services are essential services which are important to the public peace, health, and welfare of California residents. Among the ways in which local communities have provided these facilities and services has been the creation and operation of recreation and park districts. For at least seven decades, state laws have authorized recreation and park districts to provide recreation programs, local parks, and open spaces. Local officials have used this statutory authority to serve the diversity of California’s communities and residents. In enacting this chapter, it is the intent of the Legislature to create and continue a broad statutory authority for a class of special districts that provides community recreation, park, and open-space facilities and recreation services within specified boundaries and under local control. It is also the intent of the Legislature that recreation and park districts cooperate with other public agencies and private organizations to deliver those facilities and services. Further, the Legislature encourages local communities and local officials to adapt the powers and procedures provided by this chapter to meet the diversity of their own local circumstances and responsibilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5780.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board of directors” means the board of directors of a district.

(b) “City” means any city whether general law or charter, including a city and county, and including any city the name of which includes the word “town.”

(c) “Community recreation” means recreation facilities and services engaged in under the control of a district.

(d) “District” means a recreation and park district created pursuant to this chapter or any of its statutory predecessors.

(e) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, special district, school district, community college district, community redevelopment agency, joint powers agency, or any other political subdivision of the state.

(f) “Principal county” means the county having all or the greater portion of the entire assessed value, as shown on the last equalized assessment roll of the county or counties, of all taxable property within a district.

(g) “Recreation” means any voluntary activity which contributes to the education, entertainment, or cultural, mental, moral, or physical development of the individual, group, or community that attends, observes, or participates. “Recreation” includes, but is not limited to, any activity in the fields of art, athletics, drama, habitat conservation, handicrafts, literature, music, nature study, open-space conservation, science, sports, and any formal or informal play that includes these activities.

(h) “Recreation facility” means an area, place, structure, or other facility under the jurisdiction of a public agency that is used either permanently or temporarily for community recreation, even though it may be used for other purposes. “Recreation facility” includes, but is not limited to, an arts and crafts room, auditorium, beach, camp, community center, golf course, gymnasium, lake, meeting place, open space, park, parkway, playground, playing court, playing field, recreational reservoir, river, and swimming pool. A recreation facility may be owned or operated jointly by a district and other public agencies.

(i) “Voter” means a voter as defined by Section 359 of the Elections Code.

(j) “Zone” means a zone formed pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 5791).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5780.3.

(a) This chapter provides the authority for the organization and powers of recreation and park districts. This chapter succeeds the former Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780) as added by Chapter 2165 of the Statutes of 1957, as subsequently amended, and any of its statutory predecessors.

(b) Any recreation and park district organized or reorganized pursuant to the former Chapter 4 or any of its statutory predecessors which was in existence on January 1, 2002, shall remain in existence as if it had been organized pursuant to this part. Any zone of a recreation and park district formed pursuant to the former Article 10 (commencing with Section 5788) of the former Chapter 4 or any of its statutory predecessors which was in existence on January 1, 2002, shall remain in existence as if it had been formed pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Any general obligation bond, special tax, benefit assessment, fee, election, ordinance, resolution, regulation, rule, or any other action of a district taken pursuant to the former Chapter 4 or any of its statutory predecessors which was taken before January 1, 2002, shall not be voided solely because of any error, omission, informality, misnomer, or failure to comply strictly with this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5780.5.

This chapter is necessary for the public health, safety, and welfare, and shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5780.7.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision of this chapter in any circumstance or to any person, city, county, special district, school district, the state, or any agency or subdivision of the state is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application of the invalid provision, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5780.9.

Any action to determine the validity of the organization of or of any action of a district shall be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Area and Boundaries [5781. - 5781.1.]

5781.

Except as provided in this section, territory, whether incorporated or unincorporated, whether contiguous or noncontiguous, may be included in a district. Territory that is already within a recreation and park district organized pursuant to this chapter shall not be included within another recreation and park district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5781.1.

The Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000, Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code, shall govern any change of organization or reorganization of a district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Formation [5782. - 5782.7.]

5782.

A new district may be formed pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5782.1.

(a) A proposal to form a new district may be made by petition. The petition shall do all of the things required by Section 56700 of the Government Code. In addition, the petition shall do all of the following:

(1) Set forth the methods by which the district will be financed, including, but not limited to, special taxes, benefit assessments, and fees.

(2) Propose a name for the district.

(3) Specify the method of selecting the initial board of directors, as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 5783).

(4) Specify whether the district will have the power of eminent domain.

(b) The petitions, the proponents, and the procedures for certifying the sufficiency of the petitions shall comply with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 56700) of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code. In the case of any conflict between that chapter and this article, the provisions of this article shall prevail.

(c) The petition shall be signed by not less than 25 percent of the registered voters residing in the area to be included in the district, as determined by the local agency formation commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5782.3.

(a) Before circulating any petition, the proponents shall publish a notice of intention that shall include a written statement not to exceed 500 words in length, setting forth the reasons for forming the district and the methods by which the district will be financed. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the territory proposed to be included in the district. If the territory proposed to be included in the district is located in more than one county, publication of the notice shall be made in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each of the counties.

(b) The notice shall be signed by a representative of the proponent, and shall be in substantially the following form:

“Notice of Intent to Circulate Petition

Notice is hereby given of the intention to circulate a petition proposing to form the ______ (name of the district). The reasons for forming the proposed district are: ______. The method(s) by which the proposed district will be financed are ______.”

(c) Within five days after the date of publication, the proponent shall file with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the principal county a copy of the notice together with an affidavit made by a representative of the newspaper in which the notice was published certifying to the fact of the publication.

(d) After the filing required pursuant to subdivision (c), the petition may be circulated for signatures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5782.5.

(a) A proposal to form a new district may also be made by the adoption of a resolution of application by the legislative body of any county or city that contains the territory proposed to be included in the district. Except for the provisions regarding the signers, signatures, and the proponents, a resolution of application shall contain all of the matters specified for a petition in Section 5782.1.

(b) Before adopting a resolution of application, the legislative body shall hold a public hearing on the resolution. Notice of the hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the county or city. At least 20 days before the hearing, the legislative body shall give mailed notice of its hearing to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the principal county. The notice shall generally describe the proposed formation of the district and the territory proposed to be included in the district.

(c) At the hearing, the legislative body shall give any person an opportunity to present his or her views on the resolution.

(d) The clerk of the legislative body shall file a certified copy of the resolution of application with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the principal county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5782.7.

(a) Once the proponents have filed a sufficient petition or a legislative body has filed a resolution of application, the local agency formation commission shall proceed pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 56650) and, notwithstanding Section 57007 of the Government Code, pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 57000) of Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a local agency formation commission shall not approve a proposal that includes the formation of a district unless the commission determines that the proposed district will have sufficient revenues to carry out its purposes.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a local agency formation commission may approve a proposal that includes the formation of a district where the commission has determined that the proposed district will not have sufficient revenue provided that the commission conditions its approval on the concurrent approval of special taxes or benefit assessments that will generate those sufficient revenues. The commission shall provide that if the voters or property owners do not approve the special taxes or benefit assessments, the proposed district shall not be formed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Selection of the Initial Board of Directors [5783. - 5783.13.]

5783.

The initial board of directors of a district formed on or after January 1, 2002, shall be determined pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5783.1.

In the case of a district that contains only unincorporated territory in a single county, the board of directors may be elected or may be appointed by the county board of supervisors which may appoint itself as the district board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5783.3.

In the case of a district that contains only unincorporated territory in more than one county, the board of directors may be elected or may be appointed by the boards of supervisors of the counties in which the district is located. If the board of directors is appointed by the county boards of supervisors, the boards of supervisors shall appoint directors according to the proportionate share of population of that portion of each county within the district, provided that each board of supervisors shall appoint at least one director.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5783.5.

In the case of a district that contains unincorporated territory and the territory of one or more cities:

(a) The board of directors may be elected or appointed by the county board of supervisors and the city councils in which the district is located. If the board of directors is to be appointed, the board of supervisors and the city council or councils shall appoint directors according to the proportionate share of population of that portion of the county and each city within the district, provided that the board of supervisors and each city council shall appoint at least one director. The board of supervisors or city council may appoint one or more of its members to the district board.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the county board of supervisors may appoint itself as the board of directors, if the city council of each of the cities consents by resolution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5783.7.

In the case of a district that includes only incorporated territory within a single city, the board of directors may be elected or appointed by the city council which may appoint itself as the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5783.9.

In the case of a district that includes only incorporated territory in more than one city, the board of directors may be elected or appointed by the city councils in which the district is located. If the board of directors is appointed, the city councils shall appoint directors according to the proportionate share of population of that portion of each city within the district, provided that each city council shall appoint at least one director. The city council may appoint one or more of its own members to the district board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5783.11.

(a) In the case of a district where the initial board of directors is to be elected, the elections and the terms of office shall be determined pursuant to the Uniform District Election Law, Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(b) In the case of a district where the initial board of directors is to be elected, the directors may be elected (1) at large, (2) by divisions, or (3) from divisions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5783.13.

In the case of a district where the initial board of directors is to be appointed, the county board of supervisors or the city council that appoints the board of directors shall specify either of the following:

(a) The persons appointed to the board of directors shall serve fixed terms. The directors appointed to the initial board of directors shall classify themselves by lot into two classes, as nearly equal in number as possible, and the terms of office of the class having the greater number shall be four years and the terms of office of the class having the lesser number shall be two years.

(b) The persons appointed to the board of directors shall serve at the pleasure of the county board of supervisors or the city council which made the appointments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Boards of Directors and Officers [5784. - 5784.15.]
